Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 3. High Voltage Line Safety

Statutory interpretation. —

Laws 1989, ch. 127, § 3, provides: “The legislature finds that W.S.

37-3-301

through

37-3-306

are modeled from the Arizona Overhead Powerline Safety Law, Chapter 2, Article 6.4 ARS 40-360.41-45 (1980), and that Arizona case law interpreting the Arizona statutes should be used in interpreting the corresponding Wyoming statutes.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of electric company to one other than employee for injury or death arising from commencement or resumption of service, 46 ALR5th 423.

§ 37-3-301.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming High Voltage Power Lines and Safety Restrictions Act.”

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 127, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 37-3-302(a)(vi).

§ 37-3-302.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Authorized person” means:

An employee of a public utility which produces, transmits or delivers electricity;

An employee of a public utility which provides and whose work relates to communication services or state, county or municipal agencies which have authorized circuit construction on or near the poles or structures of a public utility;

An employee of an industrial plant whose work relates to the electrical system of the industrial plant;

An employee of a cable television or communication services company or an employee of a contractor of a cable television or communication services company if specifically authorized by the owner of the poles to make cable television or communication services attachments; or

An employee or agent of state, county or municipal agencies which have or whose work relates to overhead electrical lines or circuit construction or conductors on poles or structures of any type.

“High voltage” means voltage in excess of six hundred (600) volts measured between conductors or between a conductor and the ground;

“Overhead line” means all bare or insulated electrical conductors installed above ground;

“Person” or “business entity” means those parties who contract to perform any function or activity upon any land, building, highway or other premises, excluding those parties providing emergency services including emergency rescue operations and fire protection services;

“Public utility” means a public utility as defined in W.S. 37-1-101(a)(vi) which owns or operates a high voltage overhead line;

“This act” means W.S.

37-3-301

through

37-3-306

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 127, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Quoted

in

Wyrulec Co. v. Schutt, 866 P.2d 756,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 37-3-303.
Activity near overhead line; safety restrictions.

Unless danger against contact with high voltage overhead lines has been effectively guarded against as provided by W.S.

37-3-304

a person or business entity, individually or through an agent or employee or as an agent or employee, shall not:

Require any other person to perform any act if at any time during the performance of the act it is possible that the actor could move or be moved closer to any high voltage overhead line or if it is possible that any part of any tool or material used by the actor could be moved closer to any high voltage overhead line during the performance of the act than the following clearances:

For lines rated fifty (50) kilovolts or less, six (6) feet of clearance;

For lines rated over fifty (50) kilovolts, six (6) feet plus four-tenths (.4) of an inch for each kilovolt over fifty (50) kilovolts.

Operate any mechanical equipment or hoisting equipment or any load of equipment, any part of which is capable of vertical, lateral or swinging motion closer to any high voltage overhead line than the following clearances:

For lines rated fifty (50) kilovolts or less, ten (10) feet of clearance;

For lines rated over fifty (50) kilovolts, ten (10) feet plus four-tenths (.4) of an inch for each kilovolt over fifty (50) kilovolts.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 127, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Stated

in

Wyrulec Co. v. Schutt, 866 P.2d 756,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 37-3-304.
Activity in close proximity to lines; clearance arrangements; procedure; payment; notice.

If any person or business entity desires to temporarily carry on any act in closer proximity to any high voltage overhead line than permitted by this act, the person or business entity responsible for performing the work shall promptly notify the appropriate public utility and shall ask the public utility for assistance. An agent or employee of the public utility shall prepare and sign a memorandum stating the public utility received a request for assistance. The person or business entity may perform the work only after developing satisfactory safety arrangements, including coordination of work and construction schedules, with the public utility. Arrangements may include placing temporary mechanical barriers to prevent contact between material, equipment or persons and the high voltage overhead lines or temporary shut down and grounding or temporary relocation or raising of the high voltage overhead lines.

Except where the public utility has installed lines within ten (10) feet of an existing fixture or structure the person or business entity responsible for performing the work in the vicinity of the high voltage overhead lines shall pay the public utility’s actual expenses in providing safety arrangements. The public utility is not required to begin the safety arrangements until a written agreement for payment has been made.

The public utility shall begin the safety arrangements according to the agreement signed pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 127, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 37-3-302(a)(vi).

Notice provision inapplicable to low voltage wires. —

Subsection (a) did not apply to a contractor who fell and sustained injuries after touching low voltage electrical wires, despite the company's argument that the notice provision should apply when, as happened here, the voltage of the lines is unknown, since only notice would allegedly cause a utility to have a duty to provide assistance. Wyrulec Co. v. Schutt, 866 P.2d 756,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 37-3-305.
Indemnification.

If a violation of this act results in physical or electrical contact with any high voltage overhead line, the person or business entity violating this act is liable to the public utility for all damages to the facilities and all costs and expenses, including damages to third parties, incurred by the public utility as a result of the contact.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 127, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 37-3-302(a)(vi).

Stated

in

Wyrulec Co. v. Schutt, 866 P.2d 756,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for injury or death from collision with guy wire, 8 ALR5th 177.

§ 37-3-306.
Exemptions.

This act shall not apply to:

Construction, reconstruction, operation or maintenance by an authorized person of overhead electrical or communication circuits or conductors and their supporting structures or electrical generating, transmission or distribution systems or communication systems;

Any person lawfully occupying the land on which the high voltage overhead line is located and engaging in the regular and ordinary functions and activities of farming, ranching or other agricultural functions and activities.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 127, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 37-3-302(a)(vi).